Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 31.1 Veterinary Drugs

21-31.1-1.
Legislative findings — Intent.

The general assembly finds and declares it is in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare that a uniform state code is needed to regulate distributors of veterinary drugs conducting business within the state of Rhode Island; to provide for registration of distributors of veterinary drugs by a system of permits; to provide for the inspection of the establishments of distributors of veterinary drugs; and to require records on prescription veterinary drug distribution.

The intent of this chapter is to assure proper distribution of veterinary drugs to prevent adulteration of the food supply with illegal drug residues through misuse of drugs on food producing animals, and to promote the health of treated animals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Client” means the owner or caretaker of animal(s) who arranges for their veterinary care.

“Director” means the director of the department of health.

“Distributor” means and includes “manufacturers,” “wholesalers,” “veterinarians,” “pharmacists,” and “veterinary drug retailers.”

“Enforcement agency” means the department of health having responsibility for enforcing this chapter.

“Extra-label use” means the actual or intended use of a human or veterinary drug in a food-producing animal in a manner that is not in accordance with the drug’s labeling.

“Manufacturer” means a person engaged in the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, or processing of a drug or other substance or the packaging or repackaging of the substance, or the labeling or re-labeling of the commercial container of that substance, but does not include the activities of a veterinarian or pharmacist who, as an incident to the administration or dispensing of the substance in the course of professional practice, prepares, compounds, packages, or labels the substance.

“Patient” means any animal in which a prescription veterinary drug is used or intended to be used.

“Person” means any individual, or a firm, partnership, company, corporation, trustee, association, agency, or any other public or private entity.

“Pharmacist” means an individual with a currently valid license issued by the state of Rhode Island to practice pharmacy.

“Prescription” means an order from a veterinarian to a pharmacist authorizing the dispensing of a prescription veterinary drug to a client for use on or in a patient.

“Prescription drug” means a veterinary drug which, because of toxicity or other potential for harmful effect, or the method of its use, is not safe for use except under the supervision of a veterinarian, and is required by federal law to be labeled with the statement: “Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian”; and those veterinary drugs required by state law to be dispensed only upon order or prescription of a licensed veterinarian.

“Veterinarian” means an individual with a currently valid license issued by the state of Rhode Island to practice veterinary medicine and who is exempted from the permit provisions of §

21-31.1-4

.

“Veterinarian-client/patient relationship” means a relationship where all of the following conditions have been met:

The veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making medical judgments regarding the health of the animal(s) and the need for medical treatment, and the client has agreed to follow the instructions of the veterinarian.

The veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the animal(s) to initiate at least a general or preliminary (e.g. tentative) diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal(s). This means that the veterinarian has recently seen and is personally acquainted with the keeping and care of the animal(s), and/or by medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal(s) are kept.

The veterinarian is readily available for follow-up in case of adverse reactions or failure of the regimen of therapy.

The veterinarian maintains records that document patient visits, diagnosis, treatment, and other relevant information.

“Veterinary drug” means: (i) articles for animal use recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia/National Formulary of the United States; (ii) articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in animals; (iii) articles (other than feed or medicated feed) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of animals; and (iv) articles intended for use of a component of any article in paragraph (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subdivision; but does not include devices or their components, parts or accessories.

“Veterinary drug retailer” means and includes every person, authorized by law, other than a veterinarian or a pharmacist, who delivers a non-prescription veterinary drug to a client or a client’s agent.

“Wholesaler” means a person who acts as a wholesale merchant, jobber, or agent, who sells for resale, or negotiates for distribution (other than to the consumer or patient) of any veterinary drug.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-3.
Power to make regulations.

The director has the power to make reasonable rules and regulations to implement this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-4.
Permits.

Permit required. Any person who is a distributor of veterinary drugs except licensed veterinarians within the state of Rhode Island must possess a valid permit issued annually by the director.

Application for permit. Any person desiring to be a distributor of veterinary drugs shall make written application for a permit on forms provided by the director. The application shall include:

All names used by the applicant to do business.

The post office address of the applicant.

The name of the owner or operator of the business.

The street address of the business.

In the case of a partnership, the names and address of each and every partner.

In the case of a corporation, the name and title of each corporation officer or director.

Permit fees. The fee for the annual issuance of a permit shall be established by the director.

Posting of permit. A valid permit shall be prominently posted in each premise where veterinary drugs are distributed; and, where distribution is allowed, in or on the vehicle of a mobile veterinary drug distributor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-5.
Requirements for permit.

Any veterinary drug distributor except licensed veterinarians intending to operate in the state of Rhode Island shall be required to have a permit before commencing operations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 42; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 65.

21-31.1-6.
Denial of permit.

A permit may be denied for any of the following:

The applicant has failed to file a complete permit application or the application contains material false information.

The applicant is not qualified by the criteria established by regulation of the director.

The applicant has previously had a permit revoked.

The applicant has failed to pay the annual fee.

The applicant has previously been convicted of a violation of law connected with the practice of veterinary medicine or the distribution of drugs.

When a permit is denied, the director will cite the reasons for denial, and the applicant may request a hearing as provided by the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-7.
Packaging, prescriptions, labels, and records.

Packaging. A veterinary drug retailer shall deliver veterinary drugs to a client or client’s agent only in the original manufacturer’s package.

Prescriptions. A prescription is required for the dispensing of a prescription veterinary drug to any client; except that a prescription is not required for a veterinarian to dispense a veterinary drug directly to his or her client. A prescription may be refilled in accord with the veterinarian’s instructions for up to three months. A prescription is not required for wholesale transactions between distributors, provided that the person ordering prescription veterinary drugs shall furnish a permit number, a pharmacy license number, or veterinarian license number, and this number shall be recorded on the sales invoice for the transaction.

A veterinarian may issue a prescription in writing by oral communication to the dispenser, by computer connection, or other means. When the prescription is not in writing, the dispenser shall reduce the veterinarian’s prescription to writing and include this record in the prescription files.

The prescription must include: the name, address, and if written, the signature of the prescriber; the name and address of the patient/client; species for which prescribed; the name, strength and quantity of the drug; the date of issue; directions for use, withdrawal time, and cautionary statements.

Prescription files. Dispensers shall maintain on file all prescriptions filled, and shall assign and record on the prescription a consecutive prescription number. The original date of filling of the prescription, the date of any refilling of the prescription and the initials of the person(s) dispensing the drug shall be recorded on either the face or the back of the prescription.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-8.
Label of dispensed veterinary drugs.

Every veterinary drug dispensed pursuant to a prescription shall bear a label containing the name and address of the dispenser, prescription number, date of filling, name of the veterinarian, species of patient, name and strength of drug, amount dispensed, directions for use, withdrawal time, and cautionary statements, if any, appropriate for the prescription. Labels of veterinary drugs dispensed by a veterinarian shall comply with this section except for the prescription number.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-9.
Records on veterinary drug transactions.

Complete records shall be maintained by distributors of receipt and distribution of each veterinary drug. The records may be kept in the form of sales invoices, shipping records, prescription files, or of a record or ledger established solely to satisfy the requirements of this section. Records shall include all of the following information:

The name of the drug, including dosage form and strength.

The name and address of the person from whom the drug was received and the date and quantity received.

The name and address of the person to whom the drug was distributed and the date and quantity shipped or distributed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-10.
Record retention.

Records required by this chapter shall be maintained for not less than two (2) years after distribution of the drug has been completed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-11.
Inspections and samples.

For purposes of enforcement of this chapter authorized representatives of the director, upon presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, are authorized: (1) to enter, at reasonable times, any premises in which veterinary drugs are held for distribution in the state of Rhode Island; (2) to inspect at reasonable times and within reasonable limits in a reasonable manner, the premises and all pertinent records, equipment, materials, container, and facilities bearing on whether the veterinary drugs are in compliance with this chapter; and (3) to collect samples. No inspection authorized by this section shall extend to financial information, sales information (other than shipment information), pricing information, or personnel information (other than information as to qualifications of technical and professional personnel performing functions subject to this chapter). Each inspection shall be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-12.
Extra-label use.

The extra-label use of any veterinary drug in or on a food-producing animal by any person other than a veterinarian or a person working under the control of a veterinarian is a prohibited act. Extra-label use of these drugs by or on the order of a veterinarian is not prohibited provided all the following conditions are met:

A careful medical diagnosis is made by the veterinarian within the context of a valid veterinarian-client/patient relationship.

A determination is made by the veterinarian that there is no marketed drug specifically labeled to treat the condition diagnosed, or that drug therapy as recommended by the labeling has been found clinically ineffective in the animal(s) to be treated.

Procedures are instituted to assure that the identity of the treated animal is carefully maintained.

A significantly extended time period is assigned for drug withdrawal prior to marketing meat, milk, or eggs; steps are taken to assure that the recommended withdrawal times are met; and no illegal residues occur as determined by the U.S. FDA or other federal agency which may have jurisdiction, e.g. USDA, EPA.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-13.
Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the causing of them are prohibited:

The distribution within the state of Rhode Island of a veterinary drug without a valid permit.

The distribution of a prescription veterinary drug to, or its possession by, any person other than the following:

A person holding a permit required by §

21-31.1-4(a)

.

A veterinarian’s client or his or her agent, provided that the drug is dispensed by or on the prescription of the veterinarian as the relationship is defined in §

21-31.1-2(13)

.

The failure to keep records on distribution and receipt of veterinary drugs as required by §

21-31.1-7

.

The use of a code or euphemism on records, required by §

21-31.1-7

, which causes the true nature of a veterinary drug to be concealed.

The failure to permit entry or inspection and collection of samples as authorized by §

21-31.1-11

, or to produce for examination the records required to be kept by §

21-31.1-7

.

The extra-label use of a veterinary drug by any person except as provided by §

21-31.1-12

.

The removal or other authorized disposition of a drug while under detention as provided by §

21-31.1-15

.

The failure to have a valid permit posted as described in § 21-31.1-1-4(d).

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-14.
Suspension or revocation of permits.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a permit holder is engaging in or has engaged in a prohibited act, the director may notify the permit holder in writing, specifying the violation in question and advising of its intent to suspend or revoke the permit and shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-15.
Detention.

Whenever an authorized representative of the director encounters a prescription veterinary drug in the possession of a person who is not authorized by §

21-31.1-13

, the representative may affix to the drug a tag or other appropriate marking, warning all persons not to remove or dispose of the drug sale or otherwise until permission is given for removal or disposal by the director or the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-16.
Seizure and condemnation.

Any veterinary drug found in violation of this chapter shall be liable to be proceeded against and seized and condemned upon petition to the judge of the police, county, or circuit court in whose jurisdiction the drug is found. Any drug condemned under this section shall, after entry of the decree, be disposed of by destruction or sale as the court may direct and the proceeds of the sale, if sold, less the legal costs and charges, shall be paid into the treasury of the state of Rhode Island; but these articles shall not be sold or disposed of contrary to the provisions of this chapter; provided, that after entry of the decree and upon the payment of the costs of the proceedings and the execution of a good and sufficient bond conditioned that the article shall not be sold or disposed of contrary to the provisions of this chapter, the court may by order direct that the drug be delivered to its owner, to be destroyed or brought into compliance by obtaining a permit or delivery to a permit holder under the supervision of an authorized representative of the director, and the expenses of the supervision shall be paid by the person obtaining release of the drug under bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-17.
Injunction proceedings.

The appropriate courts of the state of Rhode Island shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations of this chapter. In case of violation of an injunction or restraining order issued under this section, which also constitutes a violation of this chapter, trial shall be by the court, or upon the demand of the accused by a jury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-18.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or both; provided, that if any person commits a violation after a conviction under this section becomes final, that person shall be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years or fined not more than fifteen hundred dollars ($1500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.

21-31.1-19.
Recall.

The director may require a permit holder to recall any veterinary drug that has been distributed within the state of Rhode Island in violation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 172, § 1.